Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 7 Department of Economic and Community Development
4-3-729. [Reserved.]

The department of economic and community development adopts as its official policy the principle of open records and, unless otherwise provided by this section, the information and documents maintained, received or produced by such department shall be open for inspection by the public.

Any binding contract or agreement entered into or signed by the department that obligates public funds shall, together with all supporting records and documentation, be considered a public record and open for public inspection as of the date such contract or agreement is entered into or signed.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any record, documentary materials, or other information, including proprietary information, received, produced or maintained by the department shall be considered public unless the commissioner, with the affirmative agreement of the attorney general and reporter, determines that a document or information is of such a sensitive nature that its disclosure or release would seriously harm the ability of this state to compete or conclude agreements or contracts for economic or community development.

If the commissioner, with the agreement of the attorney general and reporter, determines pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) that a document or information should not be released or disclosed because of its sensitive nature, such document or information shall be considered confidential for a period of up to five (5) years from the date such a determination is made. After such period, the document or information made confidential by this subsection (c) shall become a public record and shall be open for inspection.

This section shall not apply to trade secrets received, maintained or produced by the department. All such trade secrets shall remain confidential.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Proprietary information” means commercial or financial information that is used either directly or indirectly in the business of any person or company submitting information to the department, and that gives such person an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over competitors who do not know or use such information; and

“Trade secrets” means manufacturing processes, materials used in manufacturing processes, and costs associated with the manufacturing process of a person or company submitting information to the department.

This section shall not apply to company documents or records containing marketing information or capital plans that are provided to the department with the understanding that they are now and should remain confidential. Any such document or record shall remain confidential until such time as the provider thereof no longer requires its confidentiality.

As used in subdivision (f)(1), unless the context otherwise requires:

“Capital plans” means plans, feasibility studies, and similar research and information that will contribute to the identification of future business sites and capital investments; and

“Marketing information” means marketing studies, marketing analyses, and similar research and information designed to identify potential customers and business relationships.

Acts 1988, ch. 894, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-3-731. Execution of a separate agreement when grant or loan contract reserves right of recovery if person or entity fails to fulfill commitments — Execution of separate agreement in conjunction with capital grant contract — Reports.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department of economic and community development shall execute a separate agreement in conjunction with any grant or loan contract awarded pursuant to § 4-3-717(d)(1) that reserves the right of the department to recover the amount of money, grants, funds, or other incentives disbursed by the department, in whole or in part, if the person or entity benefitting from such money, grants, funds, or other incentives fails to fulfill the commitments made by such person or entity to the department.

For any grant or loan contract awarded pursuant to § 4-3-717(d)(1) on or after July 1, 2014, the department shall publish all baseline reports or annual reports filed with the department pursuant to this section on its website within ninety (90) days of receipt. For any grant or loan contract awarded pursuant to § 4-3-717(d)(1) between May 27, 2005, and January 1, 2011, the recipient shall be required to file a one-time report by February 1, 2015. The department shall provide a form for the reports that shall request, at a minimum:

The name of the development authority which administers the grant;

The name of the eligible business;

For baseline reports, the number of existing employees of the eligible business;

For annual reports, the number of net new jobs for the reporting period, as well as the number of cumulative net new jobs of the eligible business, and the total amount of the grant; and

Any other information that may be required by the department.

As used in this section:

“Annual report” means a report which is delivered to the department by an eligible business after execution of a grant or loan contract awarded pursuant to § 4-3-717(d)(1) on an annual basis which details the number of net new jobs for the reporting period as well as the number of cumulative net new jobs; and

“Baseline report” means a report which is delivered to the department by an eligible business upon execution of a grant or loan contract awarded pursuant to § 4-3-717(d)(1) which details the number of existing employees of an eligible business.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department shall execute a separate agreement in conjunction with any capital grant contract awarded pursuant to chapter 15 of this title, for economic development purposes. The separate agreement must reserve the right of the department to recover the amount of grants, funds, or other incentives disbursed by the department of finance and administration pursuant to the grant contract, in whole or in part, if the person or entity benefitting from the grants, funds, or other incentives fails to fulfill the commitments made by the person or entity to the department of economic and community development.

At least once each year, the department shall report to the fiscal review committee on any new clawback rights being executed by the department during the current year, as well as any clawback rights from previous years that are still being collected by the department during the current year.

As used in this subsection (e), “clawback” means a provision in an agreement or a separate agreement that reserves the right of the department to recover the amount of money, grants, funds, or other incentives disbursed by the department, in whole or in part, if the person or entity benefitting from such money, grants, funds, or other incentives fails to fulfill the commitments made by such person or entity to the department.

Acts 2013, ch. 267, § 1; 2014, ch. 924, § 1; 2019, ch. 451, § 1; 2020, ch. 772, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 267, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2013.

Acts 2014, ch. 924, § 2 provided that the act, which added subsections (b) and (c), shall apply to all grants awarded on or after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2019, ch. 451, § 4 provided that subsection (d) of this section shall apply to applicable capital grant contracts for economic development purposes executed on or after July 1, 2019.

4-3-732. Enhanced policymaking role for minority business.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of the office of business enterprise, created by §4-26-101, may, in the discretion of the commissioner, serve as a full, voting member of each committee, board, task force, group or other entity that is formally or informally attached to or established within the department for the purpose of formulating, adopting or recommending state policies to enhance economic and community development. The general assembly urges the department of economic and community development to develop an enhanced policymaking role for minority business.

Acts 1996, ch. 976, § 1.

Cross-References. Enhanced policymaking role for minority business, §4-3-2305.

4-3-733. Historically black college or university consortium or technology partnership — Memorandum of cooperation.

The department of economic and community development is authorized and directed to provide all necessary and appropriate administrative assistance, support, and guidance to facilitate strategy development and coordinated implementation by the Tennessee HBCU consortium and the Tennessee HBCU technology partnership to accomplish their respective and mutual key objectives.

In furtherance of subsection (a), the department may enter into one or more memoranda of cooperation with the consortium and the partnership on such terms as are deemed by the commissioner to be appropriate, mutually beneficial, and in the best interest of the consortium and the partnership.

Acts 2003, ch. 324, § 2.

4-3-734. Minimum energy conservation standards — New residential building construction.

Notwithstanding title 13, chapter 19 to the contrary, the minimum energy conservation standards for any new residential building construction on or after January 1, 2009, shall be the 2003 International Energy Conservation Code published by the International Code Council. Builders of new residential and commercial construction are encouraged to voluntarily utilize the 2006 International Energy Conservation Code energy conservation standards for new residential or commercial construction.

The department is requested to provide information to the public concerning the 2003 and 2006 International Energy Conservation Codes on its website.

This section shall not be construed as mandating any higher level of enforcement or inspection by local governments than that in place prior to January 1, 2009.

Acts 2008, ch. 907, § 1.

4-3-735. Energy efficiency and environmental building standards.

Energy efficiency and environmental building standards adopted by the state or by local jurisdictions:

May include the use of a sheathing with factory applied radiant barrier with an emissivity rating of five one hundredths (0.05) or less or a sheet radiant barrier with an emissivity rating of five one hundredths (0.05) or less that also meets the specifications of ASTM C1313 and is installed according to ASTM C1158; and

May include the use of lumber and engineered wood products that originate from sustainable sources and are certified through the:

SFI (Sustainable Forestry Initiative);

CSA (Canadian Standards Association);

ATFS (American Tree Farms System);

PEFC (Programme for the Endorsement of Forest Certification) endorsed schemes; and

FSC (Forest Stewardship Council).

Acts 2008, ch. 907, § 2.

4-3-736. Authority of department of economic development to allocate the national recovery zone economic development bond limitation and the national recovery zone facility bond limitation among counties and large municipalities.

The state delegates to the department of economic and community development the authority to allocate on behalf of the state the portions of the national recovery zone economic development bond limitation and the national recovery zone facility bond limitation, as the national recovery zone economic development bond limitation and the national recovery zone facility bond limitation are defined in § 1400U-1 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1400U-1), that are allocated to the state pursuant to § 1400U-1(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1400U-1(a)(1)), among the counties and large municipalities, as defined in § 1400U-1(a)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1400U-1(a)(3)(B)), in the manner provided in § 1400U-1(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1400U-1(a)(3)).

Acts 2009, ch. 608, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. 26 U.S.C. 1400U, referred to in this section, was repealed by March 23, 2018, P.L. 115-141, Div U, Title IV, § 401(d)(6)(A), 132 Stat. 1211, subject to savings provisions, as provided by Sec. 401(d)(6)(C) of P.L. 115-141, which appears as a note to Code Sec. 1400L. It provided for allocation of recovery zone bonds.

4-3-737. Small business incentive.

As an incentive to encourage the creation of more small businesses in this state by making access to essential information necessary to begin a business user friendly, the department of economic and community development, in consultation with the office of small business advocate, created within the office of the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 8-4-702, shall develop a web page to aid the user in obtaining information concerning state laws, regulations and requirements that apply to the specific type of small business the user desires to form. The web page shall have its own domain name with a URL that indicates it is related to small businesses. The web page shall also contain hyperlinks to such laws, regulations and requirements. The hyperlinks shall include, but not be limited to:

Forms or documents which a state department or agency requires to be filed for that type of business to operate in Tennessee;

Contact information and websites for boards and commissions which regulate the specific type of entity to be formed; and

Notices regarding potential and pending rule making hearings for the various boards and commissions.

The web page shall also provide notice to the user of the importance of checking with the local government where the business is to be located to ensure compliance with local zoning and code requirements and may provide a hyperlink to the county or municipality's web page, if one is maintained by the county or municipality.

All departments and agencies with regulatory authority over business shall provide assistance in the compilation of this information.

The department of economic and community development shall monitor the web page to ensure the accuracy of its information and to update it as necessary.

The office of small business advocate shall report the status of the project no later than February 15, 2013, to the commerce and labor committee of the senate and the commerce committee of the house of representatives.

Acts 2012, ch. 810, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 12; 2019, ch. 345, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 810, §§ 2 and 3 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Small Business Incentive Act.”

4-3-738. Made in Tennessee Act — Encourage producers and promotion of Tennessee products.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Made in Tennessee Act.”

The purpose of this section is to encourage producers and promotion of nonagricultural products made in this state.

The University of Tennessee Center for Industrial Services may:

Use a logo or seal for “Made in Tennessee” products and goods, except for food and agricultural products, that have been substantially processed, fabricated, manufactured or otherwise transformed in this state; and

Take appropriate steps to protect the logo or seal from misuse or infringement as deemed necessary by the center.

Prior to use of the logo or seal, a producer or retailer shall register with the center and comply with all terms, conditions and requirements for use of the logo or seal as determined by the center. A list of all producers and retailers registered with the center may be made available on the center's website.

The center may deny, suspend or revoke a producer or retailer's registration and the ability to use the logo or seal if the producer or retailer fails to comply with the terms, conditions and requirements promulgated by the center.

The department may provide technical assistance to the center upon request.

The center may seek any available grants and other sources of funding to implement and administer this section.

By February 1 of each year, the center shall report on promotion of nonagricultural products made in this state through use of a logo or seal pursuant to this section to the commerce and labor committee of the senate and the commerce committee of the house of representatives.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Agricultural products” means horticultural, poultry, dairy and farm products, livestock and livestock products, harvested trees, nursery stock and nursery products;

“Center” means the University of Tennessee Center for Industrial Services;

“Department” means the department of economic and community development;

“Producer” means any individual or legal entity engaged in the processing, fabrication, manufacture or other transformation of goods or products, other than food and agricultural products, in this state; and

“Retailer” means any individual or legal entity engaged in the business of making sales of a producer's goods or products to the public.

Acts 2013, ch. 299, § 1; 2015, ch. 131, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 345, § 7.